lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/verb-suffixing/verb-derivSuffix_semiFinalE.txt
^@~fragh(V→V):^ragh                                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to repeatedly or continuously V though perhaps unnecessarily or unsucessfully
^@~f–ragkiigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}ragkiigh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V quickly
^@~f–rakguugh(V→V):^%{.m.%}rakguugh                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be fast at V-ing; to learn to V quickly
^+rragh(V→V):^rragh                                    VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V in a fancy way
^+sagh(V→V):^sagh                                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to cause one to V or be V-ed; to endeavor to V
^+saghtugh(V→V):^saghtugh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be about to V; to go somewhere to V
^+sigh(V→V):^sigh                                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to wait for (it) to V; to cause to V
^–sighwaagh(V→V):^%{.m.%}sighwaagh                     VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to pretend to V; to V without putting effort into it; half-heartedly V
^+sugh(V→V):^sugh                                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to test how V (it) is; to check how V (it) is
^+tagh(V→V):^tagh                                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be V by nature or disposition; to keep on V-ing
^+tugh(V→V):^tugh                                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to keep on V-ing; to V by repeated actions
^+tuqagh(V→V):^tuqagh                                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V for a (short) while
^+tutkaligh(V→V):^tutkaligh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to measure the approximate the V of (it)
^~fughtagh(V→V):^ughtagh                               VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V all things available; to V completely
^–vyigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}vyigh                             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to almost V; to V to the extent that one is able
^–vzigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}vzigh                             VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to almost V; to V to the extent that one is able
^–vyiigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}vyiigh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V carelessly; to V in a rough way 
^–vziigh(V→V):^%{.m.%}vziigh                           VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V carelessly; to V in a rough way
^@~fyaghagh(V→V):^yaghagh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to V early
^@~fyaaghagh(V→V):^yaaghagh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to readily V
^@~fyaghtugh(V→V):^yaghtugh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be about to V; to go somewhere to V
^@~fyaghtuqagh(V→V):^yaghtuqagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to briefly go somewhere to V
^@~fyuggaagh(V→V):^yuggaagh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to first V; to V in the beginning
^+yuggaaqagh(V→V):^yuggaaqagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to briefly V first, to briefly V in the beginning
^@~fyugnagh(V→V):^yugnagh                              VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be easy to V
^@~fyukagh(V→V):^yukagh                                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to be ready to V; to be about to V; to be all set to V; to make a move toward V-ing
^@~fyuwhaagh(V→V):^yuwhaagh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to first V; to V in the beginning
^@~–(g)kaayagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kaayagh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but ...
^@~–(g)kaqsagh(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kaqsagh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to have V-ed fruitlessly; to have V-ed in vain; to have V-ed but ...
^+saghagh(CmpdVbl):^saghagh                            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to try to induce one to V
^+(te)snanigh(CmpdVbl):^tesnanigh                      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tell not to V; to forbid one to V
^~aghte(V→V):^%{.sf.%}agh%{t%}e                        VerbPostbaseV;   ! to suddenly V
^@–ghpagte(V→V):^%{.m.%}ghpag%{t%}e                    VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V rapidly, suddenly or in a major way
^–ghraagte(V→V):^%{.m.%}ghraag%{t%}e                   VerbPostbaseV;   ! to be somewhat V-er; to be partly V 
^–ghte(V→V):^%{.m.%}gh%{t%}e                           VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become V 
^@~%:(i/u)mafte(V→V):^%{.sf.%}umaf%{t%}e               VerbPostbaseV;   ! how much subject evidently has V-ed!
^~f–laghate(V→V):^%{.m.%}lagha%{t%}e                   VerbPostbaseV;   ! to have already V-ed together; to V as a group
^–lgute(V→V):^%{.m.%}lgu%{t%}e                         VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V together with; to help (object) V
^–mrugnite(V→V):^%{.m.%}mrugni%{t%}e                   VerbPostbaseV;   ! to seem to be somewhat V 
^@~fnaqute(V→V):^naqu%{t%}e                            VerbPostbaseV;   ! to try to V
^@~f–neghllugte(V→V):^%{.m.%}neghllug%{t%}e            VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V wrongly or with difficulty
^@–nghiighte(V→V):^%{.m.%}nghiigh%{t%}e                VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V to a large extent; to V in a big way
^@–nqegte(V→V):^%{.m.%}nqeg%{t%}e                      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V easily; to V readily
^@–nqigte(V→V):^%{.m.%}nqig%{t%}e                      VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V again
^–pigte(V→V):^%{.m.%}pig%{t%}e                         VerbPostbaseV;   ! to be very V
^~–qaghte(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}qagh%{t%}e              VerbPostbaseV;   ! to suddenly V
^~–qite(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}qi%{t%}e                  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to encounter V
^~(q/t)uute(V→V):^%{.sf.%}tuu%{t%}e                    VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V as a group; to V together
^@~f–ragkiighute(V→V):^%{.m.%}ragkiighu%{t%}e          VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V quickly
^@~f–rakegte(V→V):^%{.m.%}rakeg%{t%}e                  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V quickly
^+sugnite(V→V):^sugni%{t%}e                            VerbPostbaseV;   ! to seem to be V-ing
^@~%:(u)te(V→V):^%{.sf.%}u%{t%}e                       VerbPostbaseV;   ! to V for; to V together with; to V each other
^@~fyaghpete(V→V):^yaghpe%{t%}e                        VerbPostbaseV;   ! to evidently have V-ed but in vain
^@~fyaghqaaghte(V→V):^yaghqaagh%{t%}e                  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become necessary to V; to have to V now
^@~fyaaghte(V→V):^yaagh%{t%}e                          VerbPostbaseV;   ! to learn to V
^@~fyagute(V→V):^yagu%{t%}e                            VerbPostbaseV;   ! to reach a state of V-ing
^@~–(g)kayugughte(V→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kayugugh%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to become able to V
^+(te)snaanghite(CmpdVbl):^tesnaanghi%{t%}e            VerbPostbaseV;   ! to tell one not to V in the future; to forbid one from V-ing in the future
^+(te)ste(CmpdVbl):^tes%{t%}e                          VerbPostbaseV;   ! to cause one to V; to allow one to V; to make one V; to let one V; to have one V
^+(te)sigate(CmpdVbl):^tesiga%{t%}e**                  VerbPostbaseVI;  ! to prevent or keep one from V-ing; to not allow one to V; to not let one V

^@~%:(i/u)ma(V→N):^%{.sf.%}uma               NounPostbaseI;    ! one who V-s
^@–lghii(V→N):^%{.m.%}lghii                  NounPostbaseI;    ! the one that V-ed
^+tala(V→N):^tala                            NounPostbaseI;    ! the extent of V-ness
^@~f–yu(V→N):^%{.m.%}yu                      NounPostbaseI;    ! one who is good at V-ing
^–ghllag:^%{.m.%}ghllag                      NounInflII;       ! big N (augmentive)
^@~f–neghllug(V→N):^%{.m.%}neghllug          NounPostbaseII;   ! something that is difficult or hard to V; one who hardly needs to V
^–rkapig(V→N):^%{.m.%}rkapig                 NounPostbaseII;   ! one that is very V
^–sag(V→N):^%{.m.%}sag                       NounPostbaseII;   ! one who V-s; habitual V-er
^@~fvig(V→N):^vig                            NounPostbaseII;   ! place to V; time to V (esp. in month names)
^+tuqagh:^tuqa%{g%}h                         NounInflIII;      ! one with lots of N (augmentive)
^~–kayug(V→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kayug          NounPostbaseII;   ! one that V-s readily; one who is able to V
^+kagh(V→N):^ka%{g%}h                        NounPostbaseIII;  ! raw material for V-ing; something to be V-ed
^–lleghpigagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}lleghpiga%{g%}h   NounPostbaseIII;  ! most V one
^–lleghqagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}lleghqa%{g%}h       NounPostbaseIII;  ! future act of V-ing
^@–nghhagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}nghha%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that has recently V-ed
^~(ng)iitagh(V→N):^%{.sf.%}iita%{g%}h        NounPostbaseIII;  ! device to prevent V-ing
^~fnigh(V→N):^ni%{g%}h                       NounPostbaseIII;  ! thing that is good to V
^@–nqegtagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}nqegta%{g%}h        NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that V-s easily; one that V-s readily
^+qagh(V→N):^qa%{g%}h                        NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that is V
^+qutagh(V→N):^quta%{g%}h                    NounPostbaseIII;  ! device associated with V-ing
^@~f–rakegtagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}rakegta%{g%}h    NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that Vs quickly 
^–rkaggagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}rkagga%{g%}h         NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that is a little bit V; one that is slightly V
^+tuqagh(V→N):^tuqa%{g%}h                    NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that V-s habitually
^–tuqagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}tuqa%{g%}h             NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that V-s habitually
^~%:(u)sagh(V→N):^%{.sf.%}usa%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII;  ! something that has been V-ed
^~%:(u)sigh(V→N):^%{.sf.%}usi%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII;  ! device for V-ing; instrument for V-ing
^@~fyaghqagh(V→N):^yaghqa%{g%}h              NounPostbaseIII;  ! something that will V or be V-ed
^@~f–yuqagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}yuqa%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII;  ! one who is good at V-ing; proficient V-er
^@~–(g)kagh(V→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ka%{g%}h    NounPostbaseIII;  ! one that has V-ed; one that has been V-ed
^@ngugh(V→N):^ngugh                          NounPostbaseIV;   ! one that is V
^+aagh:^aagh                                 NounInflV;        ! one who keeps V-ing (augmentive)
^–perewaagh(V→N):^%{.m.%}perewaagh           NounPostbaseV;    ! all, only, or totally V
^~fmiigh(V→N):^miigh                         NounPostbaseV;    ! thing held by V-ing 
^~–qumtaagh(V→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}qumtaagh    NounPostbaseV;    ! frequently V-ed thing; usually V-ed thing; commonly V-ed thing
^@~fyuggaagh(V→N):^yuggaagh                  NounPostbaseV;    ! first one to V
^@~fyuwhaagh(V→N):^yuwhaagh                  NounPostbaseV;    ! first one to V
^@~%:(i/u)mate(V→N):^%{.sf.%}uma%{t%}e       NounPostbaseVI;   ! the time while V-ing; the course of V-ing
^(s)ta(V→N):^%{t%}e                          NounPostbaseVI;   ! habitual V-er; one who V-s as an occupation
^@~%:(u)te(V→N):^%{.sf.%}u%{t%}e             NounPostbaseVI;   ! condition with respect to V-ing
^–llegh(V→N):^%{.m.%}llegh                   NounPostbaseVII;  ! one that has V-ed or been V-ed; act of V-ing; activity of V-ing; the one the possessor V-ed; one or ones which are V to the greatest extent; most V one; more V one
^–lleg(V→N):^%{.m.%}lleg                     NounPostbaseVII;  ! one who V-s well; proficient V-er; good V-er
^@~f–negh(V→N):^%{.m.%}negh                  NounPostbaseVII;  ! the act of V-ing; the activity of V-ing; the state of being V
^@–negh(V→N):^%{.m.%}negh                    NounPostbaseVII;  ! the one or ones which are V to the greatest extent
^@~–(g)ke(V→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ke            NounPostbaseVIII; ! the one possessor is V-ing
^@~fnaqe(V→N):^naqe                          NounPostbaseVIII; ! one who is going to V

^@~%:(i/u)magh*(V→QUANTQUAL):^%{.sf.%}umagh  QuantQualInfl; ! while V-ing
